Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; YOUTH AND FAMILY CIRCLE OUTDOOR PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to Youth and Family Circle for outdoor programs for youth to celebrate Minnesota's outdoor culture and heritage. new text end